data/grammar/fst/demonstratives-generated.lexc
! Generated by data/grammar/fst/generate_demonstratives.py -- DO NOT HAND-EDIT.
! Rerun that script to regenerate after the source CSVs change.
! See its module docstring for exactly which rows are included/excluded.

Multichar_Symbols ad-ml ad-sc pd-ml-p pd-ml-s pd-mlsc-p pd-mlsc-s pd-sc-p pd-sc-s rad-ml rad-sc rpd-ml-p rpd-ml-s rpd-mlsc-p rpd-mlsc-s rpd-sc-p rpd-sc-s tad-abl tad-dat tad-loc tad-via tpd-abl-p tpd-abl-s tpd-acc-p tpd-acc-s tpd-dat-p tpd-dat-s tpd-gen-s tpd-loc-p tpd-loc-s tpd-sim-p tpd-sim-s tpd-via-p tpd-via-s

LEXICON DemonstrativeAdverbRootsGenerated
tagg+rad-sc:tagg TadEndings ;
tagg+rad-sc:tabg TadEndings ;
tagg+rad-sc:tapg TadEndings ;
taav+rad-ml:taav TadEndings ;
taun+rad-ml:taun TadEndings ;
taqqa+rad-sc:taqqa TadEndings ;
taqqa+rad-sc:tapqa TadEndings ;
taqqa+rad-sc:tarqa TadEndings ;
uv+rad-sc:uv TadEndings ;
tagv+rad-sc:tagv TadEndings ;
tagv+rad-sc:tabv TadEndings ;
tagv+rad-sc:takv TadEndings ;
tagv+rad-sc:talv TadEndings ;
tagv+rad-sc:tapv TadEndings ;
tagv+rad-sc:tavv TadEndings ;
ik+rad-sc:ik TadEndings ;
taik+rad-sc:taik TadEndings ;
pik+rad-sc:pik TadEndings ;
takpik+rad-sc:takpik TadEndings ;
takpik+rad-sc:tampik TadEndings ;
takpik+rad-sc:tappik TadEndings ;
takpik+rad-sc:tatpik TadEndings ;
kan+rad-sc:kan TadEndings ;
takan+rad-sc:takan TadEndings ;
ma+rad-ml:ma TadEndings ;
tama+rad-ml:tama TadEndings ;
av+rad-ml:av TadEndings ;
tauv+rad-ml:tauv TadEndings ;
pa+rad-ml:pa TadEndings ;
takpa+rad-ml:takpa TadEndings ;
takpa+rad-ml:tampa TadEndings ;
takpa+rad-ml:tappa TadEndings ;
takpa+rad-ml:tatpa TadEndings ;
un+rad-ml:un TadEndings ;
tauk+rad-ml:tauk TadEndings ;
taav+rad-sc:taav TadEndings ;

LEXICON TadEndings
++ani+tad-loc:ani # ;
++anngat+tad-abl:anngat # ;
++unga+tad-dat:unga # ;
++uuna+tad-via:uuna # ;

LEXICON TpdEndings
++ma+tpd-gen-s:ma # ;
++minga+tpd-acc-s:minga # ;
++minga+tpd-acc-s:minnga # ;
++ninga+tpd-acc-p:ninga # ;
++ninga+tpd-acc-p:ninnga # ;
++mani+tpd-loc-s:mani # ;
++nani+tpd-loc-p:nani # ;
++manngat+tpd-abl-s:manngat # ;
++nanngat+tpd-abl-p:nanngat # ;
++munga+tpd-dat-s:munga # ;
++munga+tpd-dat-s:munnga # ;
++nunga+tpd-dat-p:nunga # ;
++muuna+tpd-via-s:muuna # ;
++nuuna+tpd-via-p:nuuna # ;
++tunaq+tpd-sim-s:tunaq # ;
++titunaq+tpd-sim-p:titunaq # ;

LEXICON DemonstrativePronounRootsGenerated
qaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:qapsu TpdEndings ;
qaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:qassu TpdEndings ;
qaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:qatsu TpdEndings ;
qaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:qattu TpdEndings ;
taqqaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:taqqaksu TpdEndings ;
taqqaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tapqaksu TpdEndings ;
taqqaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tapqassu TpdEndings ;
taqqaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tapqatsu TpdEndings ;
taqqaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:taqqapsu TpdEndings ;
taqqaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:taqqassu TpdEndings ;
taqqaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:taqqatsu TpdEndings ;
taqqaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:taqqattu TpdEndings ;
taqqaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tarqaksu TpdEndings ;
taqqaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tarqassu TpdEndings ;
taqqaksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tarqatsu TpdEndings ;
qapku+rpd-mlsc-p:qapku TpdEndings ;
qapku+rpd-mlsc-p:qakku TpdEndings ;
qapku+rpd-mlsc-p:qatku TpdEndings ;
taqqapku+rpd-mlsc-p:taqqapku TpdEndings ;
taqqapku+rpd-mlsc-p:tapqakku TpdEndings ;
taqqapku+rpd-mlsc-p:tapqapku TpdEndings ;
taqqapku+rpd-mlsc-p:taqqakku TpdEndings ;
taqqapku+rpd-mlsc-p:taqqatku TpdEndings ;
taqqapku+rpd-mlsc-p:tarqakku TpdEndings ;
taqqapku+rpd-mlsc-p:tarqapku TpdEndings ;
kiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:kiksu TpdEndings ;
kiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:kipsu TpdEndings ;
kiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:kissu TpdEndings ;
kiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:kitsu TpdEndings ;
kiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:kittu TpdEndings ;
takkiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:takkiksu TpdEndings ;
takkiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:takkipsu TpdEndings ;
takkiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:takkissu TpdEndings ;
takkiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:takkitsu TpdEndings ;
takkiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:takkittu TpdEndings ;
takkiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tapkiksu TpdEndings ;
takkiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tapkissu TpdEndings ;
takkiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tapkitsu TpdEndings ;
takkiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tatkiksu TpdEndings ;
takkiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tatkissu TpdEndings ;
takkiksu+rpd-mlsc-s:tatkitsu TpdEndings ;
kikku+rpd-mlsc-p:kikku TpdEndings ;
kikku+rpd-mlsc-p:kipku TpdEndings ;
kikku+rpd-mlsc-p:kitku TpdEndings ;
takkikku+rpd-mlsc-p:takkikku TpdEndings ;
takkikku+rpd-mlsc-p:takkipku TpdEndings ;
takkikku+rpd-mlsc-p:takkitku TpdEndings ;
takkikku+rpd-mlsc-p:tapkikku TpdEndings ;
takkikku+rpd-mlsc-p:tapkipku TpdEndings ;
takkikku+rpd-mlsc-p:tapkitku TpdEndings ;
takkikku+rpd-mlsc-p:tatkikku TpdEndings ;
takkikku+rpd-mlsc-p:tatkipku TpdEndings ;
takkikku+rpd-mlsc-p:tatkitku TpdEndings ;
taaksu+rpd-ml-s:taaksu TpdEndings ;
taaksu+rpd-ml-s:taapsu TpdEndings ;
taaksu+rpd-ml-s:taassu TpdEndings ;
taaksu+rpd-ml-s:taatsu TpdEndings ;
taaksu+rpd-ml-s:taattu TpdEndings ;
tavatsu+rpd-ml-s:tavatsu TpdEndings ;
tavatsu+rpd-ml-s:tavaksu TpdEndings ;
tavatsu+rpd-ml-s:tavaktu TpdEndings ;
tavatsu+rpd-ml-s:tavapsu TpdEndings ;
tavatsu+rpd-ml-s:tavaptu TpdEndings ;
tavatsu+rpd-ml-s:tavaqtu TpdEndings ;
tavatsu+rpd-ml-s:tavassu TpdEndings ;
tavatsu+rpd-ml-s:tavattu TpdEndings ;
ipsu+rpd-ml-s:ipsu TpdEndings ;
ipsu+rpd-ml-s:iksu TpdEndings ;
ipsu+rpd-ml-s:issu TpdEndings ;
ipsu+rpd-ml-s:itsu TpdEndings ;
ipsu+rpd-ml-s:ittu TpdEndings ;
taipsu+rpd-ml-s:taipsu TpdEndings ;
taipsu+rpd-ml-s:taiksu TpdEndings ;
taipsu+rpd-ml-s:taissu TpdEndings ;
taipsu+rpd-ml-s:taitsu TpdEndings ;
taipsu+rpd-ml-s:taittu TpdEndings ;
uu+rpd-sc-s:uu TpdEndings ;
taapsu+rpd-sc-s:taapsu TpdEndings ;
taapsu+rpd-sc-s:taaksu TpdEndings ;
taapsu+rpd-sc-s:taassu TpdEndings ;
taapsu+rpd-sc-s:taatsu TpdEndings ;
taapsu+rpd-sc-s:taattu TpdEndings ;
iksu+rpd-sc-s:iksu TpdEndings ;
iksu+rpd-sc-s:ipsu TpdEndings ;
iksu+rpd-sc-s:issu TpdEndings ;
iksu+rpd-sc-s:itsu TpdEndings ;
iksu+rpd-sc-s:ittu TpdEndings ;
taiksu+rpd-sc-s:taiksu TpdEndings ;
taiksu+rpd-sc-s:taipsu TpdEndings ;
taiksu+rpd-sc-s:taissu TpdEndings ;
taiksu+rpd-sc-s:taitsu TpdEndings ;
taiksu+rpd-sc-s:taittu TpdEndings ;
piksu+rpd-sc-s:piksu TpdEndings ;
piksu+rpd-sc-s:pipsu TpdEndings ;
piksu+rpd-sc-s:pissu TpdEndings ;
piksu+rpd-sc-s:pitsu TpdEndings ;
piksu+rpd-sc-s:pittu TpdEndings ;
takpiksu+rpd-sc-s:takpiksu TpdEndings ;
takpiksu+rpd-sc-s:takpipsu TpdEndings ;
takpiksu+rpd-sc-s:takpissu TpdEndings ;
takpiksu+rpd-sc-s:takpitsu TpdEndings ;
takpiksu+rpd-sc-s:takpittu TpdEndings ;
takpiksu+rpd-sc-s:tampiksu TpdEndings ;
takpiksu+rpd-sc-s:tappiksu TpdEndings ;
takpiksu+rpd-sc-s:tappissu TpdEndings ;
takpiksu+rpd-sc-s:tappitsu TpdEndings ;
takpiksu+rpd-sc-s:tatpiksu TpdEndings ;
katu+rpd-sc-s:katu TpdEndings ;
kaksu+rpd-sc-s:kaksu TpdEndings ;
kaksu+rpd-sc-s:kapsu TpdEndings ;
kaksu+rpd-sc-s:kassu TpdEndings ;
kaksu+rpd-sc-s:katsu TpdEndings ;
kaksu+rpd-sc-s:kattu TpdEndings ;
takatu+rpd-sc-s:takatu TpdEndings ;
takaksu+rpd-sc-s:takaksu TpdEndings ;
takaksu+rpd-sc-s:takapsu TpdEndings ;
takaksu+rpd-sc-s:takassu TpdEndings ;
takaksu+rpd-sc-s:takatsu TpdEndings ;
takaksu+rpd-sc-s:takattu TpdEndings ;
uku+rpd-sc-p:uku TpdEndings ;
taakku+rpd-sc-p:taakku TpdEndings ;
taakku+rpd-sc-p:taapku TpdEndings ;
taakku+rpd-sc-p:taatku TpdEndings ;
ikku+rpd-sc-p:ikku TpdEndings ;
ikku+rpd-sc-p:ipku TpdEndings ;
ikku+rpd-sc-p:itku TpdEndings ;
taikku+rpd-sc-p:taikku TpdEndings ;
taikku+rpd-sc-p:taipku TpdEndings ;
taikku+rpd-sc-p:taitku TpdEndings ;
pikku+rpd-sc-p:pikku TpdEndings ;
pikku+rpd-sc-p:pipku TpdEndings ;
pikku+rpd-sc-p:pitku TpdEndings ;
takpikku+rpd-sc-p:takpikku TpdEndings ;
takpikku+rpd-sc-p:takpipku TpdEndings ;
takpikku+rpd-sc-p:takpitku TpdEndings ;
takpikku+rpd-sc-p:tampikku TpdEndings ;
takpikku+rpd-sc-p:tappikku TpdEndings ;
takpikku+rpd-sc-p:tappipku TpdEndings ;
takpikku+rpd-sc-p:tappitku TpdEndings ;
takpikku+rpd-sc-p:tatpikku TpdEndings ;
kakku+rpd-sc-p:kakku TpdEndings ;
kakku+rpd-sc-p:kapku TpdEndings ;
kakku+rpd-sc-p:katku TpdEndings ;
takakku+rpd-sc-p:takakku TpdEndings ;
takakku+rpd-sc-p:takapku TpdEndings ;
takakku+rpd-sc-p:takatku TpdEndings ;
matu+rpd-ml-s:matu TpdEndings ;
maksu+rpd-ml-s:maksu TpdEndings ;
maksu+rpd-ml-s:mapsu TpdEndings ;
maksu+rpd-ml-s:massu TpdEndings ;
maksu+rpd-ml-s:matsu TpdEndings ;
maksu+rpd-ml-s:mattu TpdEndings ;
tamatu+rpd-ml-s:tamatu TpdEndings ;
tamaksu+rpd-ml-s:tamaksu TpdEndings ;
tamaksu+rpd-ml-s:tamapsu TpdEndings ;
tamaksu+rpd-ml-s:tamassu TpdEndings ;
tamaksu+rpd-ml-s:tamatsu TpdEndings ;
tamaksu+rpd-ml-s:tamattu TpdEndings ;
aksu+rpd-ml-s:aksu TpdEndings ;
aksu+rpd-ml-s:apsu TpdEndings ;
aksu+rpd-ml-s:assu TpdEndings ;
aksu+rpd-ml-s:atsu TpdEndings ;
aksu+rpd-ml-s:attu TpdEndings ;
tauvaksu+rpd-ml-s:tauvaksu TpdEndings ;
tauvaksu+rpd-ml-s:tauvapsu TpdEndings ;
tauvaksu+rpd-ml-s:tauvassu TpdEndings ;
tauvaksu+rpd-ml-s:tauvatsu TpdEndings ;
tauvaksu+rpd-ml-s:tauvattu TpdEndings ;
paksu+rpd-ml-s:paksu TpdEndings ;
paksu+rpd-ml-s:papsu TpdEndings ;
paksu+rpd-ml-s:passu TpdEndings ;
paksu+rpd-ml-s:patsu TpdEndings ;
paksu+rpd-ml-s:pattu TpdEndings ;
takpaksu+rpd-ml-s:takpaksu TpdEndings ;
takpaksu+rpd-ml-s:takpapsu TpdEndings ;
takpaksu+rpd-ml-s:takpassu TpdEndings ;
takpaksu+rpd-ml-s:takpatsu TpdEndings ;
takpaksu+rpd-ml-s:takpattu TpdEndings ;
takpaksu+rpd-ml-s:tampaksu TpdEndings ;
takpaksu+rpd-ml-s:tappaksu TpdEndings ;
takpaksu+rpd-ml-s:tappassu TpdEndings ;
takpaksu+rpd-ml-s:tappatsu TpdEndings ;
takpaksu+rpd-ml-s:tatpaksu TpdEndings ;
uksu+rpd-ml-s:uksu TpdEndings ;
uksu+rpd-ml-s:upsu TpdEndings ;
uksu+rpd-ml-s:ussu TpdEndings ;
uksu+rpd-ml-s:utsu TpdEndings ;
uksu+rpd-ml-s:uttu TpdEndings ;
tauksu+rpd-ml-s:tauksu TpdEndings ;
tauksu+rpd-ml-s:taupsu TpdEndings ;
tauksu+rpd-ml-s:taussu TpdEndings ;
tauksu+rpd-ml-s:tautsu TpdEndings ;
tauksu+rpd-ml-s:tauttu TpdEndings ;
maku+rpd-ml-p:maku TpdEndings ;
tamakku+rpd-ml-p:tamakku TpdEndings ;
tamakku+rpd-ml-p:tamapku TpdEndings ;
tamakku+rpd-ml-p:tamatku TpdEndings ;
akku+rpd-ml-p:akku TpdEndings ;
akku+rpd-ml-p:apku TpdEndings ;
akku+rpd-ml-p:atku TpdEndings ;
tauvakku+rpd-ml-p:tauvakku TpdEndings ;
tauvakku+rpd-ml-p:tauvapku TpdEndings ;
tauvakku+rpd-ml-p:tauvatku TpdEndings ;
pakku+rpd-ml-p:pakku TpdEndings ;
pakku+rpd-ml-p:papku TpdEndings ;
pakku+rpd-ml-p:patku TpdEndings ;
takpakku+rpd-ml-p:takpakku TpdEndings ;
takpakku+rpd-ml-p:takpapku TpdEndings ;
takpakku+rpd-ml-p:takpatku TpdEndings ;
takpakku+rpd-ml-p:tampakku TpdEndings ;
takpakku+rpd-ml-p:tappapku TpdEndings ;
takpakku+rpd-ml-p:tatpakku TpdEndings ;
ukku+rpd-ml-p:upku TpdEndings ;
taukku+rpd-ml-p:taukku TpdEndings ;
taukku+rpd-ml-p:tautku TpdEndings ;
